Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3220
Electric and communication facilities; easement; license and agreement for construction, operation, and maintenance; fiduciaries; execution; procedure.

Easements and contracts authorized in section 30-3219 shall be entered into by administrators, executors, trustees, guardians, and conservators only upon compliance with and upon securing the approval of the county court of the county where the real estate is located in the manner provided in section 57-402, pertaining to oil and gas pipeline easements.

Laws 1961, c. 462, § 2, p. 1406;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 283;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-338;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 435.